South Dakota, session 2026, HB1137.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. The Board of Regents may contract for the planning, site preparation,
construction, furnishing, and equipping of an athletic facility at the University of South Dakota
comprised of an indoor track, long jump, triple jump, pole vault, high jump, throwing cages,
indoor sports practice areas, locker rooms, coaches’ offices, meeting rooms, training and
nutrition area, ticketing and concession areas, restrooms, elevators, suites, and seating for
two thousand spectators, including heating, air conditioning, plumbing, water, sewer,
electricity, sidewalks, landscaping, architectural and engineering services, and any other
facilities, services, or improvements, as may be required to accomplish the project, for an
estimated cost of $40,000,000, subject to permitted adjustments pursuant to section 3 of this
Act.
Section 2. There is appropriated to the Board of Regents, for the purpose authorized in this
Act, the sum of $40,000,000 in other fund expenditure authority, together with any additional
sums received pursuant to section 4 of this Act, and permitted adjustments pursuant to
section 3 of this Act.
Section 3. The cost estimate contained in this Act is stated in terms of 2026 values. The
Board of Regents may adjust the cost estimate to reflect inflation, as measured by the Building
Cost Index and reported by the Engineering News Record, and additional expenditures
required to comply with regulations adopted after the effective date of this Act, or additional
sums received pursuant to section 4 of this Act. Any adjustment to the construction cost
estimate for the project may not exceed one hundred twenty-five percent of the estimated
project construction cost stated in section 1 of this Act.

26.571.10 2 1137
Section 4. The Board of Regents may accept, transfer, and expend any moneys obtained for
the project authorized in this Act from federal sources, donations, or any other sources, all of
which comprise a special fund for the benefited project. All moneys deposited into that fund
are appropriated to the Board of Regents for the project authorized in this Act, subject to the
limitations stated in sections 1 to 3, inclusive, of this Act.
Section 5. No indebtedness, bond, or obligation incurred or created under the authority of
this Act may be or may become a lien, charge, or liability against this state, nor against the
property or funds of this state, within the meaning of the state's constitution and laws.
Section 6. The administration of the design and construction of the project authorized in this
Act shall be under the general charge and supervision of the Bureau of Human Resources and
Administration as provided in chapter 5-14.
Section 7. The executive director of the Board of Regents shall approve vouchers and the
state auditor shall draw warrants to pay expenditures authorized by this Act.
Section 8. Any amounts appropriated in this Act not lawfully expended or obligated shall
revert in accordance with the procedures prescribed in chapter 4-8.
Section 9. Whereas, this Act is necessary for the support of the state government and its
existing public institutions, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this Act shall be in
full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.
HB1137 ENROLLED

26.571.10 3 1137
An Act to make an appropriation for the design and construction of an athletic facility at the
University of South Dakota and to declare an emergency.
Received at this Executive Office
I certify that the attached Act originated in this _____ day of _____________,
the:
2026 at ____________M.
House as Bill No. 1137
By
Chief Clerk of the House for the Governor
The attached Act is hereby
approved this ________ day of
Speaker of the House ______________, A.D., 2026
Attest:
Governor
Chief Clerk of the House
STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA,
ss.
Office of the Secretary of State
President of the Senate
Filed ____________, 2026
Attest: at _________ o'clock __M.
Secretary of the Senate Secretary of State
House Bill No. 1137 By
File No. ____ Asst. Secretary of State
Chapter No. ______
HB1137 ENROLLED